Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.450

Health care entity—License requirements for legend drugs and controlled substances—Exception.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1186-S.SL) ***

(1) In order for a health care entity to purchase, administer, dispense, and deliver legend drugs, the health care entity must be licensed by the department.

(2) In order for a health care entity to purchase, administer, dispense, and deliver controlled substances, the health care entity must annually obtain a license from the department in accordance with the commission's rules.

(3) The receipt, administration, dispensing, and delivery of legend drugs or controlled substances by a health care entity must be performed under the supervision or at the direction of a pharmacist.

(4) A health care entity may only administer, dispense, or deliver legend drugs and controlled substances to patients who receive care within the health care entity and in compliance with rules of the commission. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a practitioner, in carrying out his or her licensed responsibilities within a health care entity, from dispensing or delivering to a patient of the health care entity drugs for that patient's personal use in an amount not to exceed seventy-two hours of usage.

[ 2013 c 19 s 26; 1995 c 319 s 3.]